Louisiana, session 2026, SB236.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:450.5.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§450.5.1. Chronic and rare kidney diseases; coverage; annual review
A. The legislature hereby finds all of the following:
(1) More than thirty-five million Americans currently suffer from kidney
disease and millions more may not be aware that they are at risk for developing
kidney disease in the future.
(2) There is a new era emerging of clinical innovation in kidney disease
treatment, with the first-ever treatments approved by the United States Food
and Drug Administration to slow the decline of kidney function in patients with
chronic and rare kidney diseases.
(3) Although the main causes of kidney disease are diabetes and high
blood pressure, kidney disease also has genetic and hereditary causes, including
rare diseases that cause glomerulonephritis.
(4) According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, as
many as nine out of ten Americans with chronic kidney disease are unaware
they have it.
(5) If kidney disease is detected early through blood, urine, or other tests,
it may be possible to slow its progression and delay the need for dialysis or
transplant through lifestyle changes and pharmacological treatments.
(6) Dialysis and later stages of kidney disease are costly to the state and
its healthcare system and often result in a patient leaving the workforce.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 236 ENROLLED
B. The legislature further finds that, considering the detrimental health
effects of kidney disease in this state and the United States, its enormous impact
on the lives of patients and their caregivers, and the avoidable costs to the state,
its workforce, and the healthcare system of undetected or undertreated kidney
disease, it is in the interest of the state to encourage the prevention, early
screening, diagnosis, treatment, disparity of impact, and overall awareness and
understanding of kidney disease in Louisiana.
C.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health shall conduct an annual
review of all medications and forms of treatment for chronic and rare kidney
diseases and services for enrollees with a diagnosis of chronic or rare kidney
disease that are eligible for coverage under Medicaid. The purpose of the annual
review is to determine if the available covered medications, treatments, and
services are adequate to meet the needs of enrollees with a diagnosis of chronic
or rare kidney disease, and whether the department should seek to add
additional medications, treatments, or services.
(2) When conducting the annual review required by this Subsection, the
department shall solicit and consider input from the general public, with
specific emphasis on attempting to receive input from persons or groups with
knowledge and experience in the area of chronic and rare kidney diseases.
D. The department shall examine and pursue strategic partnerships with
state-based entities who represent or provide services to individuals living with
chronic and rare kidney diseases for the purpose of increasing education,
awareness, and diagnostic screening for chronic and rare kidney diseases,
through new or existing initiatives including but not limited to Well-Ahead
Louisiana.
E. On or before July 1, 2027, and on or before July first each year
thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the president of the Senate,
the speaker of the House of Representatives, the Senate Committee on Health
and Welfare, the House Committee on Health and Welfare, and the David R.
Poynter Legislative Research Library as required by R.S. 24:771 and 772. The
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 236 ENROLLED
report shall detail the department's findings from the annual review required
by this Section, as well as any recommendations to the legislature based upon
the department's findings. The department shall publish the annual report on
its website in a manner accessible by the general public.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.